tr: Klavye standı katman türü: Yalnızca taban standı; Yalnızca ikinci katman eklentisi; İkinci katmanlı; Diğer
fr: Nombre de niveaux du support de clavier: Support de base uniquement; Complément de deuxième niveau uniquement; Avec deuxième niveau; Autre
ja: キーボードスタンドの段式タイプ: ベーススタンドのみ; 2段目アドオンのみ; 2段目あり; その他
sv: Typ av nivå för tangentbordsstativ: Endast basstativ; Endast tillägg för andra nivån; Med andra nivå; Övrigt
pl: Typ poziomów statywu na keyboard: Tylko podstawa statywu; Tylko dodatek na drugi poziom; Z drugim poziomem; Inny
es: Soporte para teclado de varios niveles: Solo base; Solo complemento de segundo nivel; Con segundo nivel; Otro
nl: Keyboardstandaard verdieping type: Alleen basisstandaard; Alleen tweede niveau-uitbreiding; Met tweede niveau; Anders
lt-LT: Klavišinio stovo lygių tipas: Tik bazinis stovas; Tik antros pakopos priedas; Su antra pakopa; Kita
pt-BR: Suporte para teclado tipo de nível: Apenas suporte base; Apenas complemento de segundo nível; Com segundo nível; Outro
th: ประเภทขาตั้งคีย์บอร์ดแบบหลายชั้น: ขาตั้งฐานเท่านั้น; ส่วนเสริมชั้นที่สองเท่านั้น; พร้อมชั้นที่สอง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de nivel (etaj) al stativului pentru claviatură: Doar suport de bază; Doar extensie pentru al doilea nivel; Cu al doilea nivel; Altele
ru: Тип ярусов стойки для клавишных: Только базовая стойка; Только дополнительный второй ярус; Со вторым ярусом; Другое
da: Typen af niveauer for keyboardstativ: Kun basestativ; Kun tilføjelse til andet niveau; Med andet niveau; Andet
fi: Kosketinsoittimen jalustatason tyyppi: Vain perusjalusta; Vain toisen tason lisäosa; Toisella tasolla; Muu
zh-TW: 鍵盤架層數類型: 僅底座; 僅第二層附加元件; 附第二層; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta nadgradnje stojala za klaviature: Samo osnovno stojalo; Samo dodatek za drugo raven; Z drugo ravnjo; Drugo
vi: Loại tầng giá đỡ bàn phím: Chỉ giá đỡ cơ sở; Chỉ tiện ích bổ sung tầng hai; Với tầng hai; Khác
sk-SK: Typ poschodového stojana na klávesy: Len základný stojan; Len doplnok druhej úrovne; S druhou úrovňou; Iné
bg-BG: Тип стойка за клавир: Само основна стойка; Само приставка за второ ниво; С второ ниво; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta stalka za klavijaturu: Samo osnovni stalak; Samo dodatak za drugu razinu; S drugom razinom; Ostalo
en: Keyboard stand tier type: Base stand only; Second tier add-on only; With second tier; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte para teclado: Apenas suporte de base; Apenas suplemento de segundo nível; Com segundo nível; Outro
cs: Typ stojanu na klávesnici: Pouze základní stojan; Pouze doplněk pro druhou úroveň; S druhou úrovní; Jiné
de: Typ der Keyboardständer-Ebene: Nur Basisständer; Nur Add-on für 2. Ebene; Mit 2. Ebene; Sonstige
hu: Emeletes billentyűzetállvány: Csak alapállvány; Csak második szintes kiegészítő; Második szinttel; Egyéb
nb: Nivåtype for keyboardstativ: Kun basisstativ; Tillegg for andre nivå; Med andre nivå; Annet
ko: 키보드 스탠드 단계 유형: 기본 스탠드 전용; 2단 추가 기능 전용; 2단 포함; 기타
it: Tipo di livello del supporto per tastiera: Solo supporto base; Solo componente aggiuntivo per secondo livello; Con secondo livello; Altro
el: Τύπος βάσης πλήκτρων: Μόνο βάση στήριξης; Μόνο πρόσθετο δεύτερου επιπέδου; Με δεύτερο επίπεδο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 键盘支架层数类型: 仅基础支架; 仅第二层附加配件; 含第二层; 其他